Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1104
Committed offender; placement at community work release and reentry center; when; conditions.

(1) The department may place a parole-eligible committed offender at a community work release and reentry center as provided in the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.

(2) Any parole-eligible committed offender placed at a community work release and reentry center pursuant to the act:

(a) Shall be under the continuing jurisdiction and authority of the department and board as if the committed offender was selected for release on ordinary parole status as provided for in section 83-192; and

(b) May be subsequently released by the board on ordinary parole status as provided for in section 83-192.

(3) The department may place a committed offender whose sentence includes a term of post-release supervision and who is within three years of his or her release date at a community work release and reentry center as provided in the act. Any such committed offender placed at a center shall be under the continuing jurisdiction and authority of the department.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 61.